Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF392.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1427SV (1) 91 th/ns S.F. 392 Section 1. Section 321.284, Code 2025, is amended to read 1 as follows: 2 321.284 Open containers in motor vehicles ââ drivers. 3 1. A driver of person operating a motor vehicle upon a 4 public street or highway shall not possess in the passenger 5 area of the motor vehicle an open or unsealed bottle, can, 6 jar, or other receptacle containing an alcoholic beverage or 7 a beverage containing any amount of tetrahydrocannabinol . 8 âPassenger areaâ means the area designed to seat the driver and 9 passengers while the motor vehicle is in operation and any area 10 that is readily accessible to the driver or a passenger while 11 in their seating positions, including the glove compartment. 12 An open or unsealed receptacle containing an alcoholic beverage 13 or an otherwise lawful beverage containing tetrahydrocannabinol 14 may be transported in the trunk of the motor vehicle. An 15 unsealed receptacle containing an alcoholic beverage or an 16 otherwise lawful beverage containing tetrahydrocannabinol 17 may be transported behind the last upright seat of the motor 18 vehicle if the motor vehicle does not have a trunk. A person 19 convicted of a violation of this section is guilty of a simple 20 misdemeanor punishable as a scheduled violation under section 21 805.8A, subsection 14 , paragraph âeâ . 22 2. A person under the age of twenty-one who violates 23 possesses an alcoholic beverage in violation of this section is 24 guilty of a violation of section 123.47 . 25 Sec. 2. Section 321.284A, subsections 1 and 4, Code 2025, 26 are amended to read as follows: 27 1. A passenger in a motor vehicle upon a public street 28 or highway shall not possess in the passenger area of the 29 motor vehicle an open or unsealed bottle, can, jar, or other 30 receptacle containing an alcoholic beverage or a beverage 31 containing any amount of tetrahydrocannabinol . âPassenger 32 areaâ means the area of a motor vehicle designed to seat the 33 driver and passengers while the motor vehicle is in operation 34 and any area that is readily accessible to the driver or a 35 -1- LSB 1427SV (1) 91 th/ns 1/ 3 S.F. 392 passenger while in their seating positions, including the glove 1 compartment. An open or unsealed receptacle containing an 2 alcoholic beverage or an otherwise lawful beverage containing 3 tetrahydrocannabinol may be transported in the trunk of 4 the motor vehicle. An unsealed receptacle containing an 5 alcoholic beverage or an otherwise lawful beverage containing 6 tetrahydrocannabinol may be transported behind the last upright 7 seat of the motor vehicle if the motor vehicle does not have a 8 trunk. 9 4. A person under the age of twenty-one years who violates 10 possesses an alcoholic beverage in violation of this section is 11 guilty of a violation of section 123.47 . 12